Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20262-1105
Rules and regulations.

(1) The department may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations that designate any agent, toxin, or organism as a high-risk agricultural pathogen or pest if such agent, toxin, or organism is capable of causing significant harm to crops, livestock, or agricultural ecosystems.

(2) The department may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the Preventing Lethal Agricultural and National Threats Act.

Laws 2026, LB1096, § 5.
July 18, 2026